District of Columbia statutes.
38-607

Student health files.

(a)

The Board of Education, with respect to public school students, and the Mayor, with respect to private school students, shall establish uniform procedures requiring elementary and secondary schools in the District to maintain health files for each student. Each student’s health file shall contain all health-related documents submitted by or on behalf of the student.

(b)

A student’s health file and all certificates of health and dental health furnished pursuant to this subchapter shall be confidential and subject to inspection, disclosure, and use only as provided by applicable District and federal law.

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-66, § 8, 32 DCR 6086
1981 Ed., § 31-2407.